Indiana, session 2026, HB1020.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 16-18-2-36.4 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 36.4. "Birth control", for
purposes of IC 16-41-19.4, has the meaning set forth in
IC 16-41-19.4-1.
SECTION 2. IC 16-41-19.4 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]:
Chapter 19.4. Prevention and Treatment: Access to Birth
Control Program
Sec. 1. As used in this chapter, "birth control" means the use of
a drug, a device, or surgery to prevent pregnancy. The term
includes any of the following:
(1) Condoms.
(2) Prescription drugs and over the counter birth control.
(3) Contraceptive devices, including long acting reversible
contraceptive (as defined in IC 12-15-47-1).
2026 IN 1020—LS 6091/DI 104


Sec. 2. The state department, in consultation with local health
departments and the office of the secretary of family and social
services, shall establish the access to birth control program for the
purpose of increasing access for low income Indiana residents to
obtain birth control.
Sec. 3. (a) The state department shall, as part of the access to
birth control program, develop effective ways to distribute birth
control to Indiana residents who have a household income of not
more than one hundred eighty-five percent (185%) of the federal
poverty level.
(b) The access to birth control program must include the
following measures:
(1) Parental consent must be obtained before distributing
birth control to an individual who is less than eighteen (18)
years of age.
(2) Reimbursement for any birth control distributed may not
be higher than the Medicaid reimbursement rate for the birth
control.
(3) An individual who qualifies for and receives birth control
under the program may not be required to pay for the birth
control.
(4) Any birth control that requires a prescription must be
obtained through a health care provider with prescriptive
authority for prescribing birth control.
Sec. 4. The state department may apply for any state or federal
funding, grants, or programs available for the implementation and
administration of the access to birth control program.
2026 IN 1020—LS 6091/DI 104